Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1836.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 3003, as
amended by Section 3, Chapter 252, O.S.L. 2022 (74 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 3003), is amended to read as follows:
Section 3003. As used in Section 3001 et seq. of this title:
1. "Blind person" means a person having a visual acuity not to
exceed 20/200 in the better eye, with correcting lenses, or visual
acuity greater than 20/200 but with limitation in the field of
vision such that the widest diameter of visual field subtends an
angle no greater than twenty (20) degrees;
2. "Council" means the State Use Advisory Council;
3. "Qualified nonprofit agency for the employment of people
with significant disabilities" means a nonprofit agency employing
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1836 Page 1

pers ons with significant disabilities who constitute work at least
seventy-five percent (75%) fifty percent (50%) of the direct labor
hours engaged in direct production, manufacturing, processing and/or
assembling of products or services offered by the agency for
procurement by this state or who meet the definition of blind person
as provided for in paragraph 1 of this section, or which is
certified as a sheltered workshop by the Wage and Hour Division of
the United States Department of Labor;
4. "Person with significant disabilities" means an individual
with a physical or mental disability constituting a substantial
handicap to employment and preventing the person from engaging in
normal competitive employment and/or includes any, a blind person,
as defined in paragraph 1 of this section, or an individual with
intellectual disability or developmental disability, as defined in
Section 1408 of Title 10 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
5. "Qualified organization" means a blind person or qualified
nonprofit agency for the employment of people with significant
disabilities contracting to supply goods or services;
6. "Manufactured" means goods made by manual labor;
7. "Produced" means to have brought into existence or created
from raw materials;
8. "Processed" means the action of taking something through an
established and mostly routine set of procedures or steps to
substantially convert a potential product from one form to another.
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1836 Page 2

This action involves a sequence of multiple steps each requiring a
distinct decision-making process to evolve a potential product to
the next step;
9. "Assemble" means to put or fit together or put together the
parts of a potential product;
10. "Central nonprofit agency (CNA)" means a qualified 501(c)3
nonprofit entity meeting the qualifications in the Request for
Procurement (RFP) issued by the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services selected to administer and oversee the State Use Program;
and
11. "Procurement schedule" means a designated schedule of
products and services currently approved by the Office of Management
and Enterprise Services Central Purchasing Division as suitable to
procure from qualified organizations participating in the State Use
Program.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.








ENGR. H. B. NO. 1836 Page 3

Passed the House of Representatives the 26th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the ___ day of ___________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate
















ENGR. H. B. NO. 1836 Page 4